Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7155.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-6 of the General Laws entitled "Departments of State
Government" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-6-16. Executive branch testimony to the general assembly; certification required.
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Executive agency” means any department, agency, board, commission, office, or
authority within the executive branch of state government, including any subdivision thereof.
(2) “Testimony” means any oral or written statement, presentation, data submission, report,
or other informational material provided to the general assembly or any committee, commission,
or member thereof, in connection with legislative proceedings or oversight.
(3) “Official executive branch testimony” means testimony that has been authorized and
certified in accordance with this section.
(b) Certification required. No testimony shall be deemed official executive branch
testimony unless it is accompanied by a written certification executed by:
(1) The head of the executive agency providing the testimony; and
(2) The governor or the governor’s designee.
(c) Contents of certification. The certification required by subsection (b) of this section
shall state that:
(1) The testimony has been reviewed and authorized for submission on behalf of the

executive branch;
(2) The factual statements and data contained therein are, to the best of the certifying
officials’ knowledge and belief after reasonable inquiry, accurate and complete as of the time
provided; and
(3) The testimony does not knowingly omit material facts necessary to prevent the
information presented from being misleading.
(d) Scope. The certification required by this section shall apply only to factual
representations and data and shall not be construed to require certification of policy judgments,
opinions, recommendations, or projections.
(e) Form and filing of certification. The certification shall be submitted in writing and shall
be maintained as part of the official legislative record for the proceeding to which the testimony
relates.
(f) Effect of noncompliance. Testimony not certified in accordance with this section shall
not be considered official executive branch testimony and shall not be relied upon by the general
assembly or any committee thereof for legislative findings, fiscal analyses, or oversight
determinations.
(g) Rules and regulations. The department of administration, in consultation with the office
of the governor, may promulgate rules and standardized certification forms to implement this
section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003584
========
LC003584 - Page 2 of 3